Florida, session 2026, SB246.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 35 320.08053, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4), 36 (5), and (6), respectively, subsection (1) is amended, and new 37 subsections (2) and (3) are added to that section, to read: 38 320.08053âEstablishment of specialty license plates.â 39 (1)âIf a specialty license plate requested by an 40 organization is approved by law, the organization must submit 41 the proposed art design for the specialty license plate to the 42 department, as soon as practicable but no later than 60 days 43 after the act approving the specialty license plate becomes a 44 law: 45 (a)âThe proposed art design for the specialty license 46 plate. 47 (b)âA 5-year financial projection that: 48 1.âOutlines anticipated revenues and planned expenditures 49 of the revenues to be derived from the sale of the requested 50 specialty license plate. 51 2.âProvides a list of administrative expenses that the 52 approved specialty license plate organization anticipates, if 53 such expenses are authorized by s. 320.08058. 54 3.âProvides a list of third parties to which the approved 55 specialty license plate organization plans to transfer, convey, 56 or otherwise distribute the specialty license plate annual use 57 fees in a medium prescribed by the department, as soon as 58 practicable, but no later than 60 days after the act approving 59 the specialty license plate becomes a law. 60 (2)âIf the financial projection required in paragraph 61 (1)(b) is not received by the department from the approved 62 specialty license plate organization within the timeframe 63 specified in subsection (1), then the specialty license plate is 64 deauthorized. 65 (3)âBy December 31 of each year, the department must submit 66 a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 67 Speaker of the House of Representatives summarizing the 68 financial projections submitted to the department pursuant to 69 paragraph (1)(b). The report must also include the departmentâs 70 notification regarding the status of organizations whose 71 revenues have been withheld as provided in s. 320.08062(2)(d). 72 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (10) and subsection 73 (12) of section 320.08056, Florida Statutes, are amended to 74 read: 75 320.08056âSpecialty license plates.â 76 (10)(a)âA specialty license plate annual use fee collected 77 and distributed under this chapter, or any interest earned from 78 those fees, may be distributed to either a domestic corporation 79 as defined in s. 617.01401(4) that has filed its articles of 80 incorporation with the Department of State pursuant to chapter 81 617 or a foreign corporation as defined in s. 617.01401 that has 82 complied with s. 617.1503 and is authorized to conduct its 83 affairs in Florida. Such corporations authorized by law to 84 collect annual use fees from a specialty license plate may not: 85 1.âTransfer, convey, or otherwise distribute the annual use 86 fees or any interest earned from those fees to any third party 87 unless the third party is a domestic corporation as defined in 88 s. 617.01401(4) which has filed its articles of incorporation 89 with the Department of State pursuant to chapter 617 or a 90 foreign corporation as defined in s. 617.01401 which has 91 complied with s. 617.1503 and is authorized to conduct its 92 affairs in Florida. 93 2.âUse the annual use fees or any interest earned from 94 those fees Be used for commercial or for-profit activities nor 95 for general or administrative expenses, except as authorized by 96 s. 320.08058 or to pay the cost of the audit or report required 97 by s. 320.08062(1). 98 3.âExpend the annual use fees or The fees and any interest 99 earned from the fees outside may be expended only for use in 100 this state unless the annual use fee is derived from the sale of 101 United States Armed Forces and veterans-related specialty 102 license plates pursuant to paragraph (3)(d) for the Support Our 103 Troops, American Legion, and Honor Flight license plates; 104 paragraphs (4)(b), (q), and (v) for the Florida Salutes 105 Veterans, United States Marine Corps, and Military Services 106 license plates, respectively; and s. 320.0891 for the U.S. 107 Paratrooper license plate. 108 (12)âNotwithstanding s. 320.08058(3)(a), the department, in 109 cooperation with the independent colleges or universities as 110 described in s. 1009.89, shall create a standard template 111 specialty license plate with a unique logo or graphic 112 identifying each independent college or university. Each 113 independent college or university may elect to use this standard 114 template specialty license plate in lieu of its own specialty 115 license plate. Annual use fees from the sale of these license 116 plates shall be distributed to the independent college or 117 university for which the logo or graphic is displayed on the 118 license plate and shall be used as provided in s. 320.08058(3). 119 An independent college or university opting to use the standard 120 template specialty license plate shall have the standard 121 template specialty license plate sales added to the total number 122 of remaining current valid registrations under paragraph (8)(a) 123 for the formerly separate independent college and university 124 license plates which were issued before the independent college 125 or university elected to use the standard template specialty 126 license plate for purposes of the standard template specialty 127 license plate meeting the minimum license plate sales threshold 128 in paragraph (8)(a) and for determining the license plate limit 129 in s. 320.08053(5)(b) s. 320.08053(3)(b). Specialty license 130 plates created pursuant to this subsection must be ordered 131 directly from the department. If the independent college or 132 university elects to use the standard template specialty license 133 plate, the department shall discontinue the existing specialty 134 license plate and, notwithstanding paragraph (8)(c), shall 135 continue to collect the applicable specialty license plate 136 annual use fee under paragraph (3)(d) or subsection (4) for the 137 remainder of the 10-year license plate replacement period for 138 the existing plate being discontinued or being replaced with the 139 standard template specialty license plate. 140 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3), subsections 141 (66) and (67), paragraph (a) of subsection (71), paragraph (a) 142 of subsection (72), paragraph (a) of subsection (73), paragraph 143 (a) of subsection (74), paragraph (a) of subsection (75), 144 paragraph (a) of subsection (76), paragraph (a) of subsection 145 (77), paragraph (a) of subsection (78), and paragraph (d) of 146 subsection (101) of section 320.08058, Florida Statutes, are 147 amended, and subsections (136) through (143) are added to that 148 section, to read: 149 320.08058âSpecialty license plates.â 150 (3)âCOLLEGIATE LICENSE PLATES.â 151 (a)âThe department shall develop a collegiate license plate 152 as provided in this section for state and independent 153 universities domiciled in this state. However, any collegiate 154 license plate created or established after October 1, 2002, must 155 comply with the requirements of s. 320.08053, other than the 156 presale voucher requirements in s. 320.08053(4)(b) s. 157 320.08053(2)(b), and be specifically authorized by an act of the 158 Legislature. Collegiate license plates must bear the colors and 159 design approved by the department as appropriate for each state 160 and independent university. The word âFloridaâ must be stamped 161 across the bottom of the plate in small letters. 162 (66)âENDLESS SUMMER LICENSE PLATES.â 163 (a)âThe department shall develop an Endless Summer license 164 plate for display on a motor vehicle and for display on a 165 motorcycle as provided in this section. Endless Summer license 166 plates must bear the colors and design approved by the 167 department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 168 plate, and the words âEndless Summerâ must appear at the bottom 169 of the plate. Any department-approved image must be placed on 170 the far left side of a plate for display on a motorcycle. 171 (b)âThe license plate annual use fees shall be distributed 172 to Surfingâs Evolution & Preservation Corporation to fund its 173 activities, programs, and projects aimed at preserving the sport 174 of surfing. Surfingâs Evolution & Preservation Corporation may 175 retain all revenue from the annual use fees until all startup 176 costs for developing and establishing the plate have been 177 recovered. Thereafter, up to 10 percent of the annual use fee 178 revenue may be used for promotion and marketing of the specialty 179 license plate and administrative costs directly associated with 180 the corporationâs programs and the specialty license plate. 181 Surfingâs Evolution & Preservation Corporation shall use the 182 remaining funds as follows: 183 1.âTo fund the proposed Surfingâs Evolution & Preservation 184 Experience project. 185 2.âTo provide funds for the provision of lifeguards or the 186 building of artificial reefs. 187 3.âTo provide funds to organizations that house the history 188 and artifacts of surfing or promote the sport through exhibits, 189 lectures, and events. 190 4.âTo support programs and events of other organizations 191 that support beaches and oceans and promote education on beach 192 safety, coastal pollution, and beach ecology. 193 (c)âThe number of valid specialty license plates issued for 194 display on a motor vehicle and for display on a motorcycle must 195 be added together to determine whether the specialty license 196 plate must be discontinued pursuant to s. 320.08056(8)(a). 197 (67)âFRATERNAL ORDER OF POLICE LICENSE PLATES.â 198 (a)1.âThe department shall develop a Fraternal Order of 199 Police license plate as provided in this section. The plate must 200 bear the colors and design approved by the department. The word 201 âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the plate, and the words 202 âFraternal Order of Policeâ must appear at the bottom of the 203 plate. 204 2.âThe department may issue the plate only to an applicant 205 who submits a notarized letter from the Florida State Lodge of 206 the Fraternal Order of Police stating that the applicant is a 207 member of the lodge in good standing or a member of a lodge 208 memberâs family, together with other fees and documents required 209 for a specialty plate. 210 (b)âThe annual use fees shall be distributed to the Florida 211 State Lodge of the Fraternal Order of Police, which shall retain 212 all proceeds until the startup costs to develop and establish 213 the plate have been recovered. Thereafter, the proceeds shall be 214 distributed to the Florida State Lodge Fraternal Order of Police 215 Memorial Foundation, Inc., a nonprofit corporation under s. 216 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which shall distribute 217 funds according to its articles of incorporation of the 218 Fraternal Order of Police and used as follows: 219 1.âA maximum of 10 percent of the proceeds may be used to 220 promote and market the plate, to administer the license plate 221 program, and to pay administrative costs directly associated 222 with the state Fraternal Order of Police Law Enforcement 223 Memorial. 224 2.âThe remaining proceeds shall be used by the foundation 225 to fund projects, programs, or events related to the memorial or 226 to fund improvements, maintenance, or other support for the 227 memorial. 228 (71)âFREEMASONRY LICENSE PLATES.â 229 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 230 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 231 the department shall develop a Freemasonry license plate as 232 provided in this section and s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 233 320.08053(1) and (2). The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top 234 of the plate, and the words âIn God We Trustâ must appear at the 235 bottom of the plate. 236 (72)âAMERICAN LEGION LICENSE PLATES.â 237 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 238 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 239 the department shall develop an American Legion license plate as 240 provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 320.08053(1) and (2) and 241 this section. The plate must bear the colors and design approved 242 by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of 243 the plate, and the words âAmerican Legionâ must appear at the 244 bottom of the plate. 245 (73)âLAURENâS KIDS LICENSE PLATES.â 246 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 247 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 248 the department shall develop a Laurenâs Kids, Prevent Child 249 Sexual Abuse license plate as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and 250 (4) s. 320.08053(1) and (2) and this section. The plate must 251 bear the colors and design approved by the department. The word 252 âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the plate, and the words 253 âLaurenâs Kidsâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 254 (74)âBIG BROTHERS BIG SISTERS LICENSE PLATES.â 255 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 256 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 257 the department shall develop a Big Brothers Big Sisters license 258 plate as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 320.08053(1) and 259 (2) and this section. The plate must bear the colors and design 260 approved by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at 261 the top of the plate, and the words âBig Brothers Big Sistersâ 262 must appear at the bottom of the plate. 263 (75)âFALLEN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS LICENSE PLATES.â 264 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 265 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 266 the department shall develop a Fallen Law Enforcement Officers 267 license plate as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 268 320.08053(1) and (2) and this section. The plate must bear the 269 colors and design approved by the department. The word âFloridaâ 270 must appear at the top of the plate, and the words âA Hero 271 Remembered Never Diesâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 272 (76)âFLORIDA SHERIFFS ASSOCIATION LICENSE PLATES.â 273 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 274 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 275 the department shall develop a Florida Sheriffs Association 276 license plate as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 277 320.08053(1) and (2) and this section. The plate must bear the 278 colors and design approved by the department. A sheriffâs star 279 must appear on the left side of the plate, the word âFloridaâ 280 must appear at the top of the plate, and the words âFlorida 281 Sheriffs Associationâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 282 (77)âKEISER UNIVERSITY LICENSE PLATES.â 283 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 284 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 285 the department shall develop a Keiser University license plate 286 as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 320.08053(1) and (2) 287 and this section. The plate must bear the colors and design 288 approved by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at 289 the top of the plate, and the words âKeiser Universityâ must 290 appear at the bottom of the plate. 291 (78)âMOFFITT CANCER CENTER LICENSE PLATES.â 292 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 45, chapter 2008-176, Laws of 293 Florida, as amended by s. 21, chapter 2010-223, Laws of Florida, 294 the department shall develop a Moffitt Cancer Center license 295 plate as provided in s. 320.08053(1) and (4) s. 320.08053(1) and 296 (2) and this section. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top 297 of the plate, and the words âMoffitt Cancer Centerâ must appear 298 at the bottom of the plate. 299 (101)âDIVINE NINE LICENSE PLATES.â 300 (d)âA Divine Nine license plate: 301 1.âMay be personalized. 302 2.âMay not be transferred between vehicle owners. 303 304 License plates created pursuant to this subsection shall have 305 their plate sales combined for the purpose of meeting the 306 minimum license plate sales threshold in s. 320.08056(8)(a) and 307 for determining the license plate limit in s. 320.08053(5)(b) s. 308 320.08053(3)(b). License plates created pursuant to this 309 subsection must be ordered directly from the department. 310 (136)âMIAMI NORTHWESTERN ALUMNI ASSOCIATION LICENSE 311 PLATES.â 312 (a)âThe department shall develop a Miami Northwestern 313 Alumni Association license plate as provided in this section and 314 s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved 315 by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of 316 the plate, and the words âMiami Northwestern Alumni Associationâ 317 must appear at the bottom of the plate. 318 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 319 distributed to the Miami Northwestern Alumni Association, Inc., 320 which may use up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative 321 costs and marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must 322 be used by the Miami Northwestern Alumni Association, Inc., to 323 fund academic programs, athletic programs, and need-based 324 scholarships for the benefit of Miami Northwestern Senior High 325 School students and the Miami Northwestern Senior High School 326 Performing and Visual Arts Center. 327 (137)âCHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS HIGH SCHOOL LICENSE PLATES.â 328 (a)âThe department shall develop a Christopher Columbus 329 High School license plate as provided in this section and s. 330 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved by 331 the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 332 plate, and the words âChristopher Columbus High Schoolâ must 333 appear at the bottom of the plate. 334 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 335 distributed to Christopher Columbus High School, Inc., which may 336 use up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative costs and 337 marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must be used by 338 Christopher Columbus High School, Inc., to fund academic 339 programs, athletic programs, and need-based scholarships for the 340 benefit of Christopher Columbus High School students. 341 (138)âULTIMATE FIGHTING CHAMPIONSHIP (UFC) LICENSE PLATES.â 342 (a)âThe department shall develop an Ultimate Fighting 343 Championship (UFC) license plate as provided in this section and 344 s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved 345 by the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of 346 the plate, and the words âUFC Lives Hereâ must appear at the 347 bottom of the plate. 348 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 349 distributed to the UFC Foundation, a nonprofit corporation under 350 s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which may use up to 351 10 percent of the proceeds to promote and market the plate. The 352 UFC Foundation shall use the remainder of the proceeds to 353 support charities and nonprofits in this state which align with 354 the foundationâs mission and goals, such as childrenâs 355 hospitals, support for first responders and the military, and 356 youth advocacy and mentorship, and to fund the development and 357 operation of youth mentorship programs in partnership with local 358 law enforcement agencies. 359 (139)âUNITED STATES NAVAL ACADEMY LICENSE PLATES.â 360 (a)âThe department shall develop a United States Naval 361 Academy license plate as provided in this section and s. 362 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved by 363 the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 364 plate, and the words âGo Navy, Beat Army!â must appear at the 365 bottom of the plate. 366 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 367 distributed to the Jacksonville Chapter of the Naval Academy 368 Alumni Association, which may use up to 10 percent of the fees 369 for administrative costs related to promotion and marketing of 370 the plate. The chapter shall use the remaining fees to provide 371 grants to charitable organizations in this state which directly 372 support veterans and their families for purposes including, but 373 not limited to: 374 1.âProviding food or shelter. 375 2.âProviding service animals or support animals to wounded 376 veterans. 377 3.âSupporting children of servicemembers killed in the line 378 of duty. 379 (140)âUNITED STATES MILITARY ACADEMY LICENSE PLATES.â 380 (a)âThe department shall develop a United States Military 381 Academy license plate as provided in this section and s. 382 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved by 383 the department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 384 plate, and the words âGo Army, Beat Navy!â must appear at the 385 bottom of the plate. 386 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 387 distributed to Bay Area Legal Services, Inc., which may use up 388 to 10 percent of the fees for administrative costs related to 389 promotion and marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees 390 must be used by Bay Area Legal Services, Inc., to fund the 391 Florida Veterans Legal Helpline. 392 (141)âMIAMI DADE COLLEGE LICENSE PLATES.â 393 (a)âThe department shall develop a Miami Dade College 394 license plate as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The 395 plate must bear the colors and design approved by the 396 department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 397 plate, and the words âMiami Dade Collegeâ must appear at the 398 bottom of the plate. 399 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 400 distributed to the Miami Dade College Foundation, Inc., which 401 may use up to 10 percent of the fees for administrative costs 402 and marketing of the plate. The balance of the fees must be used 403 by the Miami Dade College Foundation, Inc., to fund student 404 scholarships. 405 (142)âFLORIDA FILM LEGACY LICENSE PLATES.â 406 (a)âThe department shall develop a Florida Film Legacy 407 license plate as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The 408 plate must bear the colors and design approved by the department 409 in consultation with Feature Florida Partnerships, Inc. The word 410 âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the plate, and the words 411 âFilm Legacyâ must appear at the bottom of the plate. 412 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 413 distributed to Feature Florida Partnerships, Inc., a nonprofit 414 corporation under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. By 415 September 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, Feature Florida 416 Partnerships, Inc., must submit a financial report to the 417 department detailing the use of such fees during the preceding 418 fiscal year. 419 (143)âST. PETERSBURG COLLEGE LICENSE PLATES.â 420 (a)âThe department shall develop a St. Petersburg College 421 license plate as provided in this section and s. 320.08053. The 422 plate must bear the colors and design approved by the 423 department. The word âFloridaâ must appear at the top of the 424 plate, and the words âSt. Petersburg Collegeâ must appear at the 425 bottom of the plate. 426 (b)âThe annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be 427 distributed to the St. Petersburg College Foundation, Inc., and 428 allocated as follows: 429 1.âTen percent may be used for administrative costs related 430 to the promotion and marketing of the plate. 431 2.âForty percent must be dedicated to funding student 432 scholarships to ensure access to quality education for students 433 in need. 434 3.âFifty percent must be used to fund initiatives that 435 embolden student success, particularly in emerging technologies 436 and workforce development programs, to prepare students for 437 high-demand careers and the future economy. 438 Section 4.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 439 320.08062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 440 320.08062âAudits and attestations required; annual use fees 441 of specialty license plates.â 442 (2) 443 (d)âIf an organization fails to comply with the 444 departmentâs recommendations and corrective actions as outlined 445 in paragraph (c), the revenue distributions shall be 446 discontinued until completion of the next regular session of the 447 Legislature. By December 31 of each year and as part of the 448 report required in s. 320.08053(3), the department shall notify 449 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 450 the House of Representatives by the first day of the next 451 regular session of any organization whose revenues have been 452 withheld as a result of this paragraph. If the Legislature does 453 not provide direction to the organization and the department 454 regarding the status of the undistributed revenues, the 455 department shall deauthorize the plate and the undistributed 456 revenues shall be immediately deposited into the Highway Safety 457 Operating Trust Fund. 458 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.